Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2617
Sales of cattle; packer; prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for a packer to enter into a contract to purchase cattle for slaughter if:

(1) The contract specifies that the seller is not allowed to report the terms of the contract; or

(2) The date of delivery of such cattle is not specified.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 17.